Hawaii statutes.
§291E-48 Special motor vehicle
registration. (a) Anytime after the effective date of revocation or after
the administrative hearing decision is mailed pursuant to section 291E-38(i), a
qualified household member or co-owner of a motor vehicle with a respondent who
has had a motor vehicle registration revoked under this part may submit a sworn
statement to the director requesting a special motor vehicle registration. The
director may grant the request upon determining that the following conditions
have been met:

(1) The applicant is a household member of the
respondent's or a co-owner of the vehicle;

(2) The applicant has a license that has not expired
or been suspended or revoked;

(3) The applicant is completely dependent on the
motor vehicle for the necessities of life;

(4) The director finds that the applicant will take
reasonable precautions to ensure that the respondent will not drive the
vehicle; and

(5) The respondent does not have a valid ignition
interlock permit.

A person to whom a special motor vehicle
registration has been granted shall apply to the director of the appropriate
county agency for special series number plates, as provided in section 249-9.4.

(b) The director shall revoke the special
motor vehicle registration if any one of the conditions set forth in the
application no longer exist.

(c) The applicant shall be under an
affirmative duty to report to the director any changes in the conditions to the
special motor vehicle registration.

(d) The director shall adopt rules, pursuant
to chapter 91, necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. [L
2001, c 157, pt of §3; am L 2010, c 166, §18; am L 2012, c 327, §20]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next